North Carolina, session 2025, HB851.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 74E of the General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Chapter 74E.
"Company Police Act.
…
"§ 74E-6. Oaths, powers, and authority of company police officers.
…
(b) Categories. – The following three distinct classifications of company police officers
are established:
…
(1a) Hospital Police Officers. – Those company police officers who are employed
by a hospital as that term is defined under G.S. 131E-76(3).
…
(d1) Hospital Police. – Hospital police officers have the powers contained in subsection
(c) of this section and also have the powers in that subsection upon that portion of any public
road or highway passing through or immediately adjoining the property described in that
subsection, wherever located. The governing body of a hospital as defined by G.S. 131E-76(2)
may enter into a mutual aid agreement with the governing board of a municipality or, with the
consent of the county sheriff, a county to the same extent as a municipal police department
pursuant to Chapter 160A of the General Statutes.
…
(f1) Hospital Police CJLEADS Access. – Unless contrary to any federal law, regulation,
or requirement, a hospital police agency certified pursuant to this Chapter shall be granted access
to the Criminal Justice Law Enforcement Automated Data System (CJLEADS) upon (i) request
of the agency and (ii) compliance with the requirements established by the Government Data
Analytics Center (GDAC) for access to that system, including the execution of a license and
usage agreement.
(f2) Hospital Police DCIN Access. – Pursuant to all laws, rules, and regulations not
inconsistent with this subsection, hospital police agencies shall be granted access to and deemed
participating agencies of the Division of Criminal Information Network (DCIN) created under
*H851-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
G.S. 143B-905 in a manner equivalent, at a minimum, to campus police certified by the Attorney
General pursuant to Chapter 74G of the General Statutes.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 115D-5(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) In order to make instruction as accessible as possible to all citizens, the teaching of
curricular courses and of noncurricular extension courses at convenient locations away from
institution campuses as well as on campuses is authorized and shall be encouraged. A pro rata
portion of the established regular tuition rate charged a full-time student shall be charged a
part-time student taking any curriculum course. In lieu of any tuition charge, the State Board of
Community Colleges shall establish a uniform registration fee, or a schedule of uniform
registration fees, to be charged students enrolling in extension courses for which instruction is
financed primarily from State funds. The State Board of Community Colleges may provide by
general and uniform regulations for waiver of tuition and registration fees for the following:
…
(2) Courses requested by the following entities that support the organizations'
training needs and are on a specialized course list approved by the State Board
of Community Colleges:
…
f. Municipal, county, or State law enforcement agencies.
f1. Campus police agencies of private institutions of higher education
certified by the Attorney General pursuant to Chapter 74G of the
General Statutes.
f2. Hospital police agencies certified by the Attorney General pursuant to
Chapter 74E of the General Statutes.
…."
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, there shall be no
impediment to the use of the Voice Interoperability Plan for Emergency Responders (VIPER)
system by hospital police agencies certified by the Attorney General pursuant to Chapter 74E of
the General Statutes, so long as those agencies choose to acquire the necessary equipment and
utilize the VIPER system.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 851-First Edition